District of Columbia statutes.
1-137.02

Home Rule Act 40th Anniversary Celebration and Commemoration Commission. [Expired.]

Expired.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1083, 59 DCR 8025

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-137.01 and § 1-137.07.